California statutes. Financial Code
 the capital stock or other securities, or prior to any person acquiring 10 percent or more of the capital stock or other securities that have voting power or control over the management of a holding company as described herein, through the conversion of a security into another security or through the exercise of a right to purchase or subscribe to another security, that person seeking the acquisition shall make written application to the commissioner requesting written consent for the acquisition notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 25017 of the Corporations Code.

(c) With respect to the application required to be filed under subdivisions (a) and (b), the commissioner shall consent in writing or decline to consent within 60 days of the filing of a completed application.

(d) An application for consent under subdivision (a) or (b) shall be in the form and contain information
 as the commissioner may by rule or order require and shall be accompanied by a fee of four hundred dollars ($400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18139.

A sale, merger, or conversion involving an industrial loan company and another industrial loan company, a bank, or a savings association is subject to Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 277, Sec. 10.   (AB 2907)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Branch Offices [18145. - 18154.]

18145.

Subject to Section 18145.1, when authorized by the commissioner as provided in this division, an industrial loan company, pursuant to a resolution of its board of directors, may establish and maintain one or more branch offices within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18145.1.

(a) The commissioner may, by order or regulation, exempt from the requirement of authorization by the commissioner set forth in Section 18145 any establishment of an office or place of business that the commissioner finds not necessary or appropriate to regulate under that section.

(b) In granting an exemption under this section, the commissioner may impose any conditions that the commissioner finds necessary or appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 190, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18146.

The request for authority to establish a branch office shall be set forth in an application in such form and containing such information as the commissioner may require and shall be accompanied by an application fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each new branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18147.

The commissioner shall not approve an application for a branch office until the commissioner has ascertained to the commissioner’s satisfaction that the facts set forth in the application are true and:

(a) That the public convenience and advantage will be promoted by the establishment of the proposed branch office.

(b) That the industrial loan company has the capital required by this division.

(c) That the industrial loan company has established branch
 operational controls.

(d) That the financial condition of the industrial loan company justifies the establishment of the proposed branch office.

(e) (1) As to an industrial loan company transacting business before October 1, 1985, that the industrial loan company is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or (2) as to an industrial loan company commencing business on or after October 1, 1985, that the industrial loan company is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

18148.

The failure of an industrial loan company to open and operate a branch office within six months after the commissioner has issued an order approving the application for a branch office shall automatically terminate the right of the industrial loan company to open the branch office. However, the commissioner may for good cause on written application made before the expiration of the six months’ period, extend for additional periods, not in excess of six months each, the time within which the branch office may be opened.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18149.

When the commissioner has approved an application for permission to establish a branch office and the applicant pays to the commissioner an additional fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for a certificate of authorization to transact business, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authorization to transact business authorizing the opening and operation of the branch office and specifying the date on which and the conditions under which it may be opened and the place where it will be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18150.

An industrial loan company shall keep posted in a conspicuous place in each branch office the certificate of authorization to transact business issued by the commissioner permitting the operation of the branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18151.

An industrial loan company which opens a branch office without first obtaining a certificate of authorization to transact business shall forfeit to the people of the state the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for every day during which the branch office is maintained without authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18152.

The provisions of Sections 18146, 18147, 18148, 18149, 18150, and 18151 shall not affect branch offices which are opened and operating prior to September 18, 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18153.

An industrial loan company which maintains a branch office or branch offices shall give to each branch office maintained by it a specified designation by name or number and include in the designation the word “branch” or the word “office” and shall prominently display the designation at the place of business of the branch.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18154.

With the prior written approval of the commissioner, an industrial loan company may close or discontinue the opertion of any branch office provided public notice thereof is given in such manner as the commissioner directs at least 30 days before the date of closing or discontinuance.

After a branch office has been closed or discontinued, it may not be reopened without the approval of the commissioner and compliance with the applicable provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Change of Location [18165. - 18166.]

18165.

(a) Except as otherwise provided for in this division, an industrial loan company shall not transact business or make any loan provided for by this division at any other place of business than that designated in its certificate of authorization issued pursuant to Section 18101 or 18149, without having obtained the prior written approval of the commissioner.

(b) An industrial loan company may solicit and make loans and acquire obligations at a place of business other than
 designated in its certificate of authorization upon written request to and written approval of the commissioner, except as set forth in Section 18165.1, without obtaining a certificate of authorization to conduct business at a branch office pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 18145), subject to the provisions of subdivision (d). The written request for approval to conduct business shall be accompanied by a processing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for each place of business and shall include the following:

(1) The proposed location of the place of business.

(2) A description of the industrial loan company’s proposed plan of business, including a description of the manner and extent to which the industrial loan company proposes to direct and supervise the place of business.

(3) The character, business
 qualifications, and other experience of the proposed officers and managers directing the line of business for which authorization is requested.

(4) If the place of business is to be located outside of this state, a description of the regulation of the place of business by the state of the United States where the place of business is proposed to be located, including:

(A) A summary of the laws, administrative policies, and rules or regulations of the state relating to the proposed establishment and operation of the place of business.

(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the state agency having jurisdiction over the proposed establishment and operation of the place of business.

(C) A description of the extent and manner in which the
 establishment and operation of the place of business will be regulated by the state agency.

(D) Whether or not any law, administrative policy, or rule or regulation of the state of the United States where the place of business is proposed to be located would prohibit the commissioner from, or restrict the commissioner in, examining or regulating the place of business, and, if so, a citation to and summary of the law, administrative policy, rule, or regulation.

(5) Any other information bearing on the proposal that, in the opinion of the commissioner, may be relevant.

(c) The commissioner shall approve the request made pursuant to subdivision (b) within 30 days after filing unless the commissioner has ascertained that the company has failed to show any of the following:

(1) Compliance with all applicable requirements of subdivision (b).

(2) That the proposed plan of business would not violate any of the laws or the regulations of the state in which the office is proposed to conduct its business.

(3) That the company has adequate internal controls to manage the conduct of the business proposed to be conducted.

(4) That the company has a person with the necessary business qualifications, experience, or ability to direct and manage the operations of the proposed plan of business.

(d) An industrial loan company that has given notice or has been approved by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) to solicit and make loans and acquire obligations at a place of
 business other than designated in its certificate of authorization shall comply with the following:

(1) No investment certificates shall be solicited, offered, or sold at the place of business.

(2) Loan files for loans originating at the place of business shall be retained at the main or licensed branch location of the industrial loan company, and all loans originating at the place of business shall be coded in a manner so as to easily identify that place of business.

(3) The place of business shall not be identified in any manner as a branch location or as a licensed location of the industrial loan company.

(4) If the place of business is outside of this state, the industrial loan company shall, not less than five business days before commencing
 business at that place of business, file with the commissioner a report stating that the industrial loan company has complied with all laws of that state applicable to the establishment and operation of the place of business, and which contains a copy of any document issued by the state agency having jurisdiction over the proposed establishment and operation of the place of business authorizing the industrial loan company to establish the place of business.

(5) All books, accounts, papers, records, and files of the place of business shall, upon request, be made available to the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives in this state within the time specified in the request.

(6) Any other conditions and limitations the commissioner may require.

(e) An industrial loan company that opens a place of business for
 which approval is required under subdivision (b) without first obtaining the commissioner’s written approval shall be liable for a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for every day during which the place of business is maintained without approval.

(f) The commissioner may by rule, order, or regulation permit loans to be made or entered into and loans and obligations solicited and acquired at places other than designated by an industrial loan company in its certificate of authorization if those loans can be so made consistent with the purposes of the Industrial Loan Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 190, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18165.1.

(a) The commissioner may, by order or regulation, exempt from the requirement of authorization by the commissioner set forth in Section 18165 any establishment of an office or place of business that the commissioner finds not necessary or appropriate to regulate under that section.

(b) In granting an exemption under this section, the commissioner may impose any conditions that the commissioner finds necessary or appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 190, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18166.

(a) If an industrial loan company desires to change its place of business to a street address other than that designated in its authorization, it shall give written notice to the commissioner who shall issue his or her written authorization of the change, provided the commissioner finds the change would not justify a negative finding with respect to any matters set forth in Section 18117 or 18147.

(b) The commissioner may, by order or regulation, exempt from the requirement
 of authorization by the commissioner set forth in subdivision (a) any change of location of a place of business that the commissioner finds not necessary or appropriate to regulate under that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 190, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Loans and Purchased Obligations [18190. - 18303.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [18190. - 18192.]

18190.

An industrial loan company may:

(a) Loan money, secured or unsecured, with or without the pledge of its installment investment certificates.

(b) Collect and receive charges for loans in advance or otherwise.

(c) Purchase, sell, or discount the following obligations: bona fide trust receipts, secured or unsecured choses in action, conditional sales contracts, or
 security agreements.

(d) Purchase, sell, discount, or originate lease obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18191.

Sections 18008, 18009, 18010, 18212, 18212.1, 18214, 18219, 18220, 18222, 18230 through 18234, 18290 through 18295, and 18439 do not apply to:

(a) Any bona fide loan of a principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more or to an industrial loan company in connection with any such loan if the provisions of the section are not used for the purpose of evading this division.

(b) An amount due from a contingent guarantor on his or her obligations purchased under the provisions of this division.

(c) A loan to a primary borrower who has pledged accounts receivable or installment accounts to secure loans which taken in the aggregate amount to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 858, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

18191.5.

Sections 18008, 18009, 18010, 18212, 18212.1, and 18214 do not apply to:

(a) Any bona fide loan of a principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, or to an industrial loan company in connection with any bona fide loan of a principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more if the provisions of the section are not used for the purpose of evading this division.

(b) An amount due from a contingent guarantor on his or her obligations purchased under the provisions of this
 division.

(c) A loan to a primary borrower who has pledged accounts receivable or installment accounts to secure loans which taken in the aggregate amount to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 68, Sec. 1.   Effective April 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18192.

The payment of money, credit, goods, or things in action as consideration for any sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of wages, salary, commissions, or other compensation for services, whether earned or to be earned, is, for the purposes of regulation under this division, a loan secured by such assignment, and the amount by which the assigned compensation exceeds the amount of consideration actually paid is interest and charges upon or for such loan from the date of payment to the date the compensation is payable. This section does not modify or affect existing statutes governing wage assignments in this state, or authorize such assignments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Terms and Maximum Charges [18205. - 18222.]

18205.

Except as otherwise provided for in this division, an industrial loan company shall not make any loan or purchase or discount any other obligation that provides for a repayment of principal over more than 120 months and 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18205.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an industrial loan company may make a loan or acquire an obligation that is repayable in unequal periodic payments during its term and that is secured by either real property or personal property. In order to ensure the safety and soundness of industrial loan companies and to avoid an unreasonable concentration of loans and obligations that could result in balloon payments, all these loans and obligations with a term in excess of 10 years shall be repaid in substantially equal weekly, semimonthly, monthly,
 or quarterly installments during the term. For purposes of this section, “real property” means real property other than home loans and other residential real property loans subject to Title VIII (Alternative Mortgage Transaction Parity Act of 1982) of the Garn-St. Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982, as those terms are defined in Part 541 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended. For purposes of this section, the term of a nonconsumer loan or a nonconsumer obligation secured solely or primarily by personal property shall not exceed 15 years and 30 days from the date the loan is made or obligation is acquired by the industrial loan company. For purposes of this section, the term of a nonconsumer loan or a nonconsumer obligation secured primarily by real property shall be as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 18210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18206.

Consumer loans made and obligations acquired that are secured by a motor vehicle and repayable other than in equal periodic payments during its term shall not exceed 50 percent of all consumer loans and obligations that are secured by motor vehicles or 20 percent of assets, whichever is less. This section shall not apply to a loan made to a graduate student while attending an accredited college or university and for the purpose of actively pursuing a study program leading to a postbaccalaureate degree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18207.

An industrial loan company may make a consumer loan that is not secured primarily by real property or other type of loan which is repayable at maturity by a single payment which includes principal and charges. In no event shall such loans have a term in excess of one year or be made for the purpose of evading or avoiding this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18208.

An industrial loan company may make a consumer loan in which the principal and charges are payable at any time during the loan, provided that the loan is secured at all times at least 100 percent by either investment certificates of an industrial loan company authorized to conduct business in the State of California under this division or traded securities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18209.

An industrial loan company may make loans, purchase or discount notes, mortgages, contracts or other commercial paper insured by the Federal Housing Administrator, Veterans Administration, other federal agency or an agency of the state. Loans so insured may be made for a term up to but not to exceed the maximum permitted by such agencies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18210.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 18205.5 and 18209 and subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), an industrial loan company shall not make any loan or purchase or discount any note secured primarily by real property unless the loan or other obligation is repayable in substantially equal weekly, semimonthly, monthly, or quarterly installments during its term, which shall not exceed 30 years and 30 days from the date the loan or other obligation is made or acquired by the company. Equal installment requirements shall not apply to adjustable or
 variable rate loans or obligations made or purchased by the industrial loan company in accordance with Title VIII of the Garn-St. Germaine Depository Institutions Act of 1982 and any applicable regulations, guidelines, and policies adopted thereunder. However, an industrial loan company may make loans secured by first trust deeds on real property containing single family, or one to four residential, units provided that the repayment period for each loan does not exceed 40 years and 30 days from the date the loan is made by the company. All loans with repayment periods in excess of 30 years and 30 days shall not exceed in the aggregate 5 percent of all outstanding loans and obligations of the company.

(b) Any consumer loan or any purchase or discount of any consumer obligation having a term in excess of three years from the date the loan or other obligation is made or acquired by the company shall be secured solely by real property or solely by
 personal property. However, if the original principal amount of the consumer loan or obligation is twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more, then the loan or obligation shall be secured solely by real property or solely by personal property, or by both real property and personal property. All loans and obligations made and purchased pursuant to this subdivision shall be repayable in installments and within a term not to exceed the limitations set forth in subdivision (a), except that consumer loans or obligations secured solely by personal property shall have a term not to exceed the term provided for in Section 18205 and except as otherwise may be provided for in Sections 18207, 18208, and 18209. The equal installment requirements set forth in subdivision (a) shall not apply to loans or obligations made or purchased by the industrial loan company in accordance with Title VIII of the Garn-St. Germaine Depository Institutions Act of 1982 and any applicable regulations, guidelines, and policies adopted
 thereunder.

(c) In order to ensure the safety and soundness of industrial loan companies and to avoid an unreasonable concentration of loans and obligations that could result in balloon payments, all loans and obligations with a term in excess of 15 years and 30 days shall be repaid in substantially equal weekly, semimonthly, monthly, or quarterly installments during their term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18211.

No charge shall be collected unless a loan is made, except that an industrial loan company may charge, contract for, and receive a fee in connection with making a written commitment to make a loan, secured by real property having a face amount in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) whether or not the loan is consummated, or in connection with the purchase, sale, or origination of a lease as lessor and may charge, contract for, and receive an application fee for a loan having an original principal balance in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or for a lease which payments are in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000), provided, however, that
 a disclosure statement setting forth the amount of the fee, which may be reviewed by the commissioner as to form and content, shall be provided to each person to whom an application fee is charged. The commitment fee or the loan application fee with respect to a consumer loan shall be limited to the actual expenses incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 790, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18212.

(a) The charges by an industrial loan company, broker, and all other persons on any loan, forbearance of money, credit, goods, or things in action under this division, shall not exceed in the aggregate:

(1) Two percent per month on that part of the unpaid principal balance of any loan up to, including, but not in excess of, one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) One percent per month on any remainder of such unpaid principal balance in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) As an alternative to the charges authorized by subdivision (a), a company may contract for and receive charges at a rate not exceeding 1.6 percent per month on the unpaid principal balance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18212.1.

As an alternative to the charges authorized by Section 18212 a licensee may contract for and receive charges at a rate not exceeding five-sixths of 1 percent per month plus a percentage per month equal to one-twelfth of the annual rate prevailing on the 25th day of the second month of the quarter preceding the quarter in which the loan is made as established by the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco on advances to member banks under Section 13 and 13a of the Federal Reserve Act as now in effect or hereafter from time to time amended, or if there is no
 such single determinable rate for advances, the closest counterpart of such rate as shall be designated by the commissioner. Charges shall be calculated on the unpaid principal balance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 588.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18212.2.

In addition to the charges authorized by Section 18212 or 18212.1 an industrial loan company may contract for and receive an administrative fee, which shall be fully earned immediately upon making the loan, with respect to a loan of a principal amount of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) at a rate not in excess of 5 percent of the principal amount or fifty dollars ($50), whichever is lesser. No administrative fee may be contracted for or received in connection with refinancing a loan unless at least one year has elapsed since receipt of a previous administrative fee paid by the borrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 890, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

18213.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law not within this division, industrial loan companies making loans pursuant to this division may not precompute interest on such loans.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18214.

For the purpose of computing the charges set forth in this article, a month is any period of 30 consecutive days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18215.

An industrial loan company may contract for, collect, and receive at the time of making the loan or at any time thereafter, any of the following:

(a) Any cost of publication as required by law.

(b) The statutory fee paid by it to any public officer for acknowledging, filing, recording, or releasing in any public office any instrument securing the loan or executed in connection with a loan.

(c) Premiums of the kind and to the extent described in paragraph (2) of
 subsection (e) of Section 226.4 of Regulation Z promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 C.F.R. 226.1 et seq.).

These amounts are not included in computing the maximum charges which may be made under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18216.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 18211, an appraisal fee may be charged to an applicant or borrower by an industrial loan company in connection with an application or request for any loan having a face amount in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) that is secured primarily by real property whether or not the loan is made. That fee shall not exceed the actual cost of the appraisal. The appraisal shall be rendered to the industrial loan company in writing by a qualified appraiser approved pursuant to Title XI of the Financial Institutions
 Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, Public Law 101-73, and any applicable regulations, guidelines, and policies adopted thereunder. Only one fee for appraising the same real property made in connection with the same applicant or borrower may be collected unless the applicant or borrower has obtained a new or additional loan and more than one year has elapsed since the prior appraisal. The fee is not included in charges as defined in this division or in computing the maximum charges that may be made under this division.

(b) If an appraisal fee is charged, a copy of the appraisal report shall be provided by the industrial loan company upon the request of the borrower or applicant at or before the closing of a loan transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18217.

An escrow fee of a reasonable amount may be charged for any loan made which is secured primarily by real property when such services are actually performed. Such fee shall be considered reasonable when paid to a company licensed to do business under the Escrow Law, Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000), or any person exempted by the Escrow Law, provided that such fees are comparable to fees being charged by escrow companies so authorized to do business in this state. Such fee is not included in computing the maximum charges which may be made under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18218.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an industrial loan company, in the collection of a delinquent loan of an unpaid principal balance, may do any of the following:

(a) Collect and receive the court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees allowed by a court in a judgment against a defaulting debtor. 

(b) Contract for, collect, and receive the bona fide expenses actually incurred and paid by the industrial loan company, not exceeding 10 percent of the unpaid principal balance of the loan where no judgment at
 law is sought. 

(c) Contract for, collect, and receive the bona fide expenses actually incurred and paid by the industrial loan company in obtaining a certificate of compliance or certificate of noncompliance issued for a motor vehicle pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code and the rules and regulations of the State Air Resources Board prior to the consignment of the vehicle for sale at public auction, pursuant to Sections 24007 and 24007.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1054, Sec. 1.3.)
-------------------------------------------

18218.5.

With respect to a loan under this division, a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) for return by a depository institution of a dishonored check, negotiable order of withdrawal, or share draft may be charged and collected by the licensee. The fee is not included in charges as defined in this division or in determining the applicable maximum charges which may be made under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 101, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18219.

An industrial loan company shall not induce or permit any borrower to split up or divide any loan and thereby contract for or receive a higher rate of charge than would otherwise be permitted by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18220.

An industrial loan company shall not induce any spouses, jointly or severally, to become obligated, directly or contingently or both, under more than one contract of loan at the same time, with the result of obtaining a higher rate of charge than would otherwise be permitted by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 38.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18221.

Nothing in this division shall prevent an industrial loan company from transacting loan contracts with different borrowers and from contracting for and receiving, up to and including the highest rate of charge permitted by this division at the time of making said loans; provided, however, that if any person is obligated to and does pay more than one loan contract outstanding at the same time, the entire amount of charges paid by such person and received by the industrial loan company on such loan contracts, shall not exceed the maximum that would be permitted by this division if all such loan contracts so paid were combined into one loan transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18222.

An industrial loan company shall permit payment to be made in advance in any amount on any contract of loan at any time. The industrial loan company shall apply such payment first to all charges due up to the date of such payment and the remainder to the loan balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disclosure and Loan Documents [18230. - 18235.]

18230.

Each industrial loan company shall display prominently in each place of business a full and accurate schedule of the maximum charges to be made and the method of computing the same. The schedule is subject to the approval of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18231.

Each industrial loan company shall:

(a) Deliver or cause to be delivered to the borrowers, or any one thereof, at the time the loan is made, a written statement showing in clear and distinct terms the name and address of such company and the broker, if any. The statement shall show the date, amount, and maturity of the loan contract, how and when repayable, the nature of the security, if any, for the loan, and the agreed rate of charge.

(b) Obtain from the borrower a signed statement as to whether any person has performed any act as a broker in
 connection with the making of the loan. If such statement discloses a broker or other person has participated, the company shall obtain a full statement of all sums paid or payable to the broker or other person.

(c) Keep the statements required by this section for a period of two years from and after the date the loan has been paid in full, or has matured according to its terms, or has been charged off.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18233.

An industrial loan company shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the person making any payment in person in cash at any office of the company, at the time such payment is made on account of any loan, a plain and complete receipt showing the total amount received and identifying the loan contract upon which such payment is applied, and showing the unpaid balance of the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18234.

An industrial loan company shall upon repayment of any loan in full, cancel or plainly mark “paid” and return to the borrower or person making final payment, the note evidencing the loan. If such borrower is not otherwise obligated to such company, the company shall release all security for such loan, endorse and return any certificate of ownership, and return to the borrower any security agreement, assignment, or order signed by the borrower, except such as are a part of the court record in any action, or such as have been delivered to a third person for the purpose of carrying out the terms thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18235.

An industrial loan company shall not take any note, promise to pay, or security agreement that does not accurately disclose the actual amount of the loan, the time for which it is made, and the agreed rate of charge, nor any instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Credit Cards [18245. - 18245.]

18245.

(a) Subject to any regulations that the commissioner may issue, an industrial loan company may issue credit cards and may acquire or hold obligations resulting from the use of credit cards.

(b) Except as the commissioner may otherwise provide by regulation or order, the acquiring and holding of obligations pursuant to subdivision (a) are not subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 18205) or Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 18300).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Limitations and Regulations of Loans and Purchased Obligations [18265. - 18274.]

18265.

An industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding shall not make any loan or purchase or discount any other obligation with a maturity of more than 60 months and 15 days unless all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The loan or other obligation is secured.

(b) The property, or collateral securing the loan or other obligation, is of a kind or class that has been declared eligible by regulation of the commissioner.

(c) The aggregate
 principal balance of such loans and other obligations outstanding with a remaining maturity of more than 60 months and 15 days at any time shall not exceed a percentage of the aggregate principal balance due on all loans and other obligations owing to the industrial loan company by rule of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 858, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

18266.
